Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 69 Fiduciaries Generally
28-69-305. Compliance with environmental law.

The fiduciary shall be entitled to charge the cost of any inspection, review, abatement, response, cleanup, or remedial action authorized herein in compliance with environmental law against the income or principal of the trust or estate.

A fiduciary shall not be personally liable to any beneficiary or other party for any decrease in value of assets in trust or in an estate by reason of the fiduciary's compliance with any environmental law, specifically including any reporting requirement under such a law.

Neither the acceptance by the fiduciary of property nor a failure by the fiduciary to inspect property shall be deemed to create any inference as to whether or not there is or may be any liability under any environmental law with respect to that property.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1989, No. 841, § 4, provided that this subchapter shall apply to all trusts now existing or hereafter created, irrespective of existing or prior litigation in which revocation, modification, or termination is or has been sought.

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 841, § 7: Mar. 22, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that courts of competent jurisdiction need statutory authority to allow for the termination, modification, or revocation of trusts in circumstances where the purposes of such trusts are not being fulfilled or are frustrated by circumstances not foreseen by the settlors. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

Consent of a secondary beneficiary to trust amendments was not required because the express terms of the trusts permitted the amendments at issue.Dawson v. Stoner-Sellers, 2019 Ark. 410, 591 S.W.3d 299 (2019).

Trial court considered case law from other jurisdictions that permitted the modification the trustee requested in this case, in order to qualify a beneficiary for public benefits, but the trial court did not find that the modification was permissible under public policy and Arkansas law; the court was not left with a firm conviction that a mistake was committed.In re Ruby G. Owen Trust, 2012 Ark. App. 381, 418 S.W.3d 421 (2012).

Trustee intended to modify the trust in order to qualify a beneficiary for public benefits; because impoverishing the beneficiary in order to qualify her would make the trust provisions void, the modified provisions would have been void on grounds of public policy, and the trial court's denial of the modification motion was that the purpose for modifying the trust would be defeated.In re Ruby G. Owen Trust, 2012 Ark. App. 381, 418 S.W.3d 421 (2012).

Where the sole beneficiary of a trust and the trustee consented to a transfer of all of the trust assets to a new trust, the original trust was properly terminated, even though court approval of the termination was not obtained pursuant to subsection (a) of this section because, under §28-69-403, subsection (a) did not preclude the termination of a trust pursuant to its terms or otherwise in accordance with applicable law. In re Schultz, 324 B.R. 712 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 2005).

Circuit court did not err in granting a motion for directed verdict in an action to terminate a trust, because the beneficiary failed to meet her burden of proof under the statutory procedures set forth in this section and §28-73-411; there was no evidence of a change in circumstances between the establishment of the trust and the settlor's death that would frustrate the purpose of the trust. Neither the timing of the settlor's death, nor the fact that the beneficiary had to disrupt her employment to care for her mother were unforeseen circumstances that frustrated the purpose of the trust.Buckalew v. Arvest Trust Co., N.A., 2013 Ark. App. 28, 425 S.W.3d 819 (2013).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 421, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Revocation, Modification, or Termination of Trust

28-69-401. Consent.

By written consent of the settlor and all named beneficiaries of a trust or any part thereof, regardless of any spendthrift or similar protective provisions, the trust or part thereof may be revoked, modified, or terminated upon a finding by the court having jurisdiction over the trust, or otherwise being of competent jurisdiction, that the trust's purposes, as expressed in or implied by the circumstances surrounding the trust, as a result of circumstances not foreseen to the settlor are not effectively being fulfilled or are frustrated.

(1)For purposes of this section, consent to the revocation, modification, or termination may be given by the court on behalf of unnamed, legally incapacitated, unascertained, or unborn beneficiaries after a hearing in which the interests of such beneficiaries are represented by a guardian ad litem.

A guardian ad litem for any such beneficiaries may rely on general family benefit accruing to the living named beneficiaries and their families as a basis for approving, or not objecting to, any such revocation, modification, or termination and, in so doing, shall be immune from liability to future claims of any unnamed, legally incapacitated, unascertained, or unborn beneficiaries.

In circumstances in which objection is made by a guardian ad litem for beneficiaries who are not, by name or category, mentioned in a trust that is sought to be terminated, modified, or revoked, upon a finding that there is general family benefit to the living named beneficiaries and their families, the court shall allow the termination, modification, or revocation sought.

(1)For purposes of this section, consent may be given on behalf of the estate of a deceased settlor by the court on a finding that there is general family benefit to the living named beneficiaries and their families.

A personal representative of a settlor's estate may rely on general family benefit accruing to the living named beneficiaries and their families as a basis for approving, or not objecting to, any such revocation, modification, or termination and, in so doing, shall be immune from liability to future claims of any unnamed, legally incapacitated, unascertained, or unborn beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 841, § 1.

28-69-402. Liability of trustee.

A trustee of a trust that is sought to be terminated, modified, or revoked, in whole or in part, pursuant to the terms of this subchapter, may rely on general family benefit accruing to the living named beneficiaries and their families as a basis for approving, or not objecting to, any such revocation, modification, or termination and, in so doing, shall be immune from liability to future claims of any unnamed, legally incapacitated, unascertained, or unborn beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 841, § 2.

28-69-403. Revocation, etc., by other means not precluded.

Nothing in this subchapter shall prevent revocation, modification, or termination of a trust pursuant to its terms, or otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 841, § 3.

Subchapter 5

— Retirement Plan — Spendthrift Trust

28-69-501. Spendthrift trust.

Any retirement plan which meets the requirements of section 401 or section 403 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which contains a prohibition against alienation and a prohibition against attachment shall be conclusively presumed for the purposes of Arkansas law to be a spendthrift trust.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1021, § 1.

U.S. Code. Sections 401 and 403 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in this section, are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 401 and 403.

Subchapter 6

— Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act

28-69-601 — 28-69-611. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 262, § 2. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

28-69-601. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 1.

28-69-603. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 3; 2003, No. 1109, § 2.

28-69-605. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 5.

28-69-607. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 7; 2003, No. 1109, § 4.

28-69-609. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 9.

28-69-611. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 12.

28-69-701. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Trustee Division of Trusts Act”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

28-69-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Trust” means any express trust, with additions thereto, wherever and however created, or any separate share of a trust and includes any arrangement other than an estate which, although not a trust, has substantially the same effect as a trust; and

“Trustee” means an original, additional, or successor trustee of an inter vivos or testamentary trust, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court, and, in the case of an arrangement which is not an estate or a trust but which has substantially the same effect as a trust, the person in actual or constructive possession of the property subject to the arrangement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

28-69-703. Authority to divide trusts.

Unless expressly prohibited by the terms of the governing instrument, when property is held or to be held in a trust, the trustee is authorized, but not required, to divide the trust into two (2) or more separate trusts of equal or unequal value if the trustee determines that division of the trust is in the best interests of the beneficiaries or could result in a significant decrease in current or future federal income, gift, estate, or generation-skipping transfer taxes, or any other tax.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

28-69-704. Exercise of authority by trustee.

A trustee may exercise the authority granted in this subchapter without procuring any judicial authorization or approval.

A trustee may exercise the authority granted in this subchapter to divide both funded and unfunded trusts, provided, however, that:

An unfunded testamentary trust may be divided only after the will establishing the trust has been admitted to probate; and

An unfunded nontestamentary trust may be divided only if the governing instrument establishing the trust is not revocable.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

28-69-705. Effect of exercise of authority.

If a trustee divides a trust into separate trusts under this subchapter, the terms of the separate trusts need not be identical but must provide for the same succession of interests and beneficiaries as are provided in the original trust. Differing tax elections may be made for each of the separate trusts.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

28-69-706. Applicability.

This subchapter applies to all trustees regardless of whether the trust was created before, on, or after the date of enactment.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 585, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. As to the “date of enactment,” referred to in this section, the date of the passage of Senate Bill 499, Acts 1997, No. 585, was March 17, 1997, and its effective date was August 1, 1997.

Subchapter 8

— Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (2006)

28-69-801. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (2006).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-802. Definitions.

In this subchapter:

“Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose, or any other purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

“Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part thereof that, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis. The term does not include assets that an institution designates as an endowment fund for its own use.

“Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to, transferred to, or held by an institution as an institutional fund.

“Institution” means:

a person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes;

a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent that it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose; or

a trust that had both charitable and noncharitable interests, after all noncharitable interests have terminated.

“Institutional fund” means a fund held by an institution exclusively for charitable purposes. The term does not include:

program-related assets;

a fund held for an institution by a trustee that is not an institution; or

a fund in which a beneficiary that is not an institution has an interest, other than an interest that could arise upon violation or failure of the purposes of the fund.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Program-related asset” means an asset held by an institution primarily to accomplish a charitable purpose of the institution and not primarily for investment.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-803. Standard of conduct in managing and investing institutional fund.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an institution, in managing and investing an institutional fund, shall consider the charitable purposes of the institution and the purposes of the institutional fund.

In addition to complying with the duty of loyalty imposed by law other than this subchapter, each person responsible for managing and investing an institutional fund shall manage and invest the fund in good faith and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In managing and investing an institutional fund, an institution:

may incur only costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the institution, and the skills available to the institution; and

shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the management and investment of the fund.

An institution may pool two or more institutional funds for purposes of management and investment.

Except as otherwise provided by a gift instrument, the following rules apply:

In managing and investing an institutional fund, the following factors, if relevant, must be considered:

general economic conditions;

the possible effect of inflation or deflation;

the expected tax consequences, if any, of investment decisions or strategies;

the role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall investment portfolio of the fund;

the expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

other resources of the institution;

the needs of the institution and the fund to make distributions and to preserve capital; and

an asset's special relationship or special value, if any, to the charitable purposes of the institution.

Management and investment decisions about an individual asset must be made not in isolation but rather in the context of the institutional fund's portfolio of investments as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the fund and to the institution.

Except as otherwise provided by law other than this subchapter, an institution may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with this section.

An institution shall diversify the investments of an institutional fund unless the institution reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the fund are better served without diversification.

Within a reasonable time after receiving property, an institution shall make and carry out decisions concerning the retention or disposition of the property or to rebalance a portfolio, in order to bring the institutional fund into compliance with the purposes, terms, and distribution requirements of the institution as necessary to meet other circumstances of the institution and the requirements of this subchapter.

A person that has special skills or expertise, or is selected in reliance upon the person's representation that the person has special skills or expertise, has a duty to use those skills or that expertise in managing and investing institutional funds.

the investment policy of the institution.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-804. Appropriation for expenditure or accumulation of endowment fund — Rules of construction.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in the gift instrument, an institution may appropriate for expenditure or accumulate so much of an endowment fund as the institution determines is prudent for the uses, benefits, purposes, and duration for which the endowment fund is established. Unless stated otherwise in the gift instrument, the assets in an endowment fund are donor-restricted assets until appropriated for expenditure by the institution. In making a determination to appropriate or accumulate, the institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and shall consider, if relevant, the following factors:

the duration and preservation of the endowment fund;

the purposes of the institution and the endowment fund;

general economic conditions;

the possible effect of inflation or deflation;

the expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

other resources of the institution; and

To limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subsection (a), a gift instrument must specifically state the limitation.

Terms in a gift instrument designating a gift as an endowment, or a direction or authorization in the gift instrument to use only “income”, “interest”, “dividends”, or “rents, issues, or profits”, or “to preserve the principal intact”, or words of similar import:

create an endowment fund of permanent duration unless other language in the gift instrument limits the duration or purpose of the fund; and

do not otherwise limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subsection (a).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-805. Delegation of management and investment functions.

Subject to any specific limitation set forth in a gift instrument or in law other than this subchapter, an institution may delegate to an external agent the management and investment of an institutional fund to the extent that an institution could prudently delegate under the circumstances. An institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, in:

selecting an agent;

establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes of the institution and the institutional fund; and

periodically reviewing the agent's actions in order to monitor the agent's performance and compliance with the scope and terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the institution to exercise reasonable care to comply with the scope and terms of the delegation.

An institution that complies with subsection (a) is not liable for the decisions or actions of an agent to which the function was delegated.

By accepting delegation of a management or investment function from an institution that is subject to the laws of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in all proceedings arising from or related to the delegation or the performance of the delegated function.

An institution may delegate management and investment functions to its committees, officers, or employees as authorized by law of this state other than this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-806. Release or modification of restrictions on management, investment, or purpose.

If the donor consents in a record, an institution may release or modify, in whole or in part, a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund. A release or modification may not allow a fund to be used for a purpose other than a charitable purpose of the institution.

The court, upon application of an institution, may modify a restriction contained in a gift instrument regarding the management or investment of an institutional fund if the restriction has become impracticable or wasteful, if it impairs the management or investment of the fund, or if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the donor, a modification of a restriction will further the purposes of the fund. The institution shall notify the Attorney General of the application, and the Attorney General must be given an opportunity to be heard. To the extent practicable, any modification must be made in accordance with the donor's probable intention.

If a particular charitable purpose or a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the use of an institutional fund becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the court, upon application of an institution, may modify the purpose of the fund or the restriction on the use of the fund in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument. The institution shall notify the Attorney General of the application, and the Attorney General must be given an opportunity to be heard.

If an institution determines that a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund is unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the institution, 60 days after notification to the Attorney General, may release or modify the restriction, in whole or part, if:

the institutional fund subject to the restriction has a total value of less than $25,000;

more than 20 years have elapsed since the fund was established; and

the institution uses the property in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-807. Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with this subchapter is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or action is taken, and not by hindsight.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-808. Application to existing institutional funds.

This subchapter applies to institutional funds existing on or established after the effective date of this subchapter. As applied to institutional funds existing on the effective date of this subchapter this subchapter governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after that date.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-809. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This subchapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101 of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(a), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103 of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

28-69-810. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 262, § 1.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2009, No. 262, codified as §28-69-801 et seq.

28-69-811, 28-69-812. [Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 11 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act, an effective date provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.

Section 12 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act, a repealing provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.

28-69-602. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 2; 2003, No. 1109, § 1.

28-69-604. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 4; 2003, No. 1109, § 3.

28-69-606. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 6.

28-69-608. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 8.

28-69-610. Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 70, § 11.

Subchapter 7

— Trustee Division of Trusts Act